Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.195

Obstruction of public servant—Penalty.

No person shall intentionally obstruct or attempt to obstruct a public servant in the administration or enforcement of this chapter by using or threatening to use physical force or by means of any unlawful act. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 11; 1974 ex.s. c 135 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 155: See note following RCW 9.46.010.